Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2231
Constables; authority; violation; penalty.

In serving all civil process and in doing his or her duties generally, when not otherwise restricted by law, the authority of a constable shall extend throughout the territory in which the judges of the county court who appointed him or her have jurisdiction, and in executing and serving process issued by courts inferior to the district court, he or she shall have and exercise the same authority and powers over goods and chattels and the persons or parties and in serving process as is granted by law to a sheriff under like process issued from courts of record. Any constable who shall knowingly perform or attempt to perform any official act outside of the territory in which the court which appointed him or her has jurisdiction shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than ten nor more than one hundred dollars or shall be imprisoned for not more than ten days.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 177, p. 324;

C.S.1929, § 22-1507;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,178;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,178;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 42;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 24-5,101.